Massachusetts, session 194th, H355.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 1. Section 54A of chapter 112 of the General Laws, as appearing in the most 
recent edition, is hereby amended by inserting at the end thereof the following:- 
“Veterinarian-client Patient Relationship (VCPR)”, (a) the veterinarian has assumed the 
responsibility for making clinical judgments regarding the health of the patient and the client has 
agreed to follow the veterinarian's instructions; (b) the veterinarian has sufficient knowledge of 
the patient to initiate at least a general or preliminary diagnosis of the medical condition of the 
patient. This means that the veterinarian and/or his or her veterinary practice has recently seen, 
or is personally acquainted with, the care of the animal patient by doing any of the following: (1) 
examining the animal patient in person, or (2) examining the animal patient by use of 
synchronous audio-video communication, or (3) making medically appropriate and timely visits 
to the premises on which the animal patient is kept; (c) the veterinarian is readily available for 
follow-up evaluation or has arranged for the following: veterinary emergency coverage and 

of 6 13 continuing care and treatment; (d) the VCPR shall extend to associate veterinarians within the 
same practice. 
SECTION 2. Section 58A1/2 of the General Laws, as appearing in the most recent 
edition, is hereby amended by striking subsection (b) and inserting place thereof the following:- 
(b) A veterinarian may dispense a compounded drug to a companion animal if: (i) the 
companion animal is a patient within a valid veterinarian-client-patient relationship; (ii) the 
quantity dispensed does not exceed a 120 hour supply; (iii) the compounded drug is for the 
treatment of an emergency condition; and (iv) timely access to a compounding pharmacy is not 
available, as determined by the prescribing veterinarian. 
SECTION 3. Chapter 112 of the General Laws, as appearing in the most recent edition, is 
hereby amended by inserting the following new section:- 
Section 55C. (a) A veterinarian shall not prescribe, dispense, or administer a drug, 
medicine, application, or treatment of whatever nature for the prevention, cure, or relief of a 
wound, fracture, bodily injury, or disease of animals unless a veterinarian-client-patient 
relationship exists or as otherwise permitted by law, except when the animal patient is a wild 
animal or the owner of the animal patient is unknown. A veterinarian-client-patient relationship 
exists if all of the following conditions are met: 
(1) The client has authorized the veterinarian to assume responsibility for medical 
judgments regarding the health of the animal patient; and 
(2) The veterinarian possesses sufficient knowledge of the animal patient to initiate at 
least a general or preliminary diagnosis of the animal patient’s medical condition; and 

of 6 34  (3) The veterinarian has assumed responsibility for making medical judgments regarding 
the health of the animal patient and has communicated with the client a medical, treatment, 
diagnostic, or therapeutic plan appropriate to the circumstances. 
(b) A veterinarian possesses sufficient knowledge of the animal patient for if the 
veterinarian has recently seen, or is personally acquainted with, the care of the animal patient by 
doing any of the following: 
(1) Examining the animal patient in person; or 
(2) Examining the animal patient by use of synchronous audio-video communication; or 
(3) Making medically appropriate and timely visits to the premises on which the animal 
patient is kept. 
(c) For purposes of paragraphs (1) and (3) of subsection (a), the client may authorize an 
agent to act on the client’s behalf. 
(d) Synchronous audio-video communication is not required for the delivery of veterinary 
medicine via telehealth after a veterinarian-client-patient relationship has been established unless 
the veterinarian determines that it is necessary in order to provide care consistent with prevailing 
veterinary medical practice. 
(e) A veterinarian-client-patient relationship shall not be established solely by audio-only 
communication or by means of a questionnaire. 
(f) Only a person who holds a current license to practice veterinary medicine in this state 
is authorized to practice veterinary medicine via telehealth on an animal patient located in this 
state. 

of 6 55  (g) Before delivering veterinary medicine via telehealth, the veterinarian shall inform the 
client about the use and potential limitations of telehealth and obtain consent from the client to 
use telehealth, including acknowledgment of all of the following: 
(1) The same standards of care apply to veterinary medicine services via telehealth and 
in-person veterinary medical services; and 
(2) The client has the option to choose an in-person visit from a veterinarian at any time; 
and 
(3) The client has been advised how to receive follow-up care or assistance in the event 
of an adverse reaction to the treatment or in the event of an inability to communicate resulting 
from technological or equipment failure. 
(h) A veterinarian who practices veterinary medicine via telehealth shall do all of the 
following: 
(1) Ensure that the technology, method, and equipment used to provide veterinary 
medicine services via telehealth comply with all current privacy protection laws. 
(2) Have historical knowledge of the animal patient by obtaining and reviewing the 
animal patient’s relevant medical history, and, if available, medical records. If medical records 
exist from a previous in-person visit and are available to the client, the client may transmit those 
records, including any diagnostic data contained therein, to the veterinarian electronically. 
(3) Employ sound professional judgment to determine whether using telehealth is an 
appropriate method for delivering medical advice or treatment to the animal patient and 
providing quality of care consistent with prevailing veterinary medical practice. 

of 6 76  (4) Be familiar with available medical resources, including emergency resources near the 
animal patient’s location, be able to provide the client with a list of nearby veterinarians who 
may be able to see the animal patient in person upon the request of the client, and keep, maintain, 
and make available a summary of the animal patient record. 
(5) Provide the client with the veterinarian’s name, contact information, and license 
number. 
(6) Secure an alternative means of contacting the client if the electronic means is 
interrupted. 
(i)(1) A veterinarian shall not prescribe a drug for a duration of time that is inconsistent 
with the medical condition of the animal patient or the type of drug prescribed. 
(2) A veterinarian who established the required veterinarian-client-patient relationship by 
examining the animal patient in person or by making medically appropriate and timely visits to 
the premises on which the animal patient is kept shall not prescribe a drug for a duration of time 
that is longer than one year from the date that the veterinarian examined the animal patient in 
person or visited the premises and prescribed the drug. 
(3) Except as provided in paragraphs (4) to (7), inclusive, of this subsection, a 
veterinarian who practices veterinary medicine via telehealth may order, prescribe, or make 
available drugs, as defined in Section 1 of Massachusetts Controlled Substance Act (Title XV 
Chapter 94C), in accordance with all relevant state and federal regulations. 
(4) A veterinarian who established the required veterinarian-client-patient relationship 
using synchronous audio-video communication shall not prescribe a drug to the animal patient 

of 6 97 for use for a period longer than six months from the date upon which the veterinarian examined 
the animal patient or prescribed the drug. The veterinarian shall not issue another prescription to 
the animal patient for the same drug unless they have conducted another examination of the 
100 animal patient, either in person or using telehealth. 
101  (5) A veterinarian who established the required veterinarian-client-patient relationship 
102 using synchronous audio-video communication shall not prescribe an antimicrobial drug to the 
103 animal patient for a period longer than 14 days of treatment. The veterinarian shall not issue any 
104 further antimicrobial drug prescription, including a refill, to treat the condition of the animal 
105 patient unless the veterinarian has conducted an in-person examination of the animal patient. 
106  (6) The veterinarian shall not order, prescribe, or make available a controlled substance, 
107 as defined in Section 1 of Massachusetts Controlled Substance Act (Title XV Chapter 94C), or 
108 xylazine, unless the veterinarian has performed an in-person physical examination of the animal 
109 patient or made medically appropriate and timely visits to the premises where the animal patient 
110 is kept. 
111  (7) The veterinarian shall notify the client that some prescription drugs or medications 
112 may be available at a pharmacy and, if requested, the veterinarian shall submit a prescription to a 
113 pharmacy that the client chooses. 
114  (j) A veterinarian is permitted to use telehealth without establishing a veterinarian-client-
115 patient relationship in order to provide advice in an emergency.